Utah statutes.
16-10a-1104.   Merger of parent and subsidiary.
(1)  By complying with the provision of this section, a parent corporation
owning at least 90% of the outstanding shares of each class of a subsidiary
corporation may either merge the subsidiary into itself or merge itself into
the subsidiary.
(2)  The board of directors of the parent shall adopt and its shareholders, if
required by Subsection (3), shall approve a plan of merger that sets forth:
(a)  the names of the parent and subsidiary and the name of the surviving
entity;
(b)  the terms and conditions of the merger;
(c)  the manner and basis of converting the shares of each corporation into
shares, obligations, or other securities of the surviving or any other
corporation or into money or other property in whole or part;
(d)  any amendments to the articles of incorporation of the surviving
corporation to be effected by the merger; and
(e)  any other provisions relating to the merger as may be determined to be
necessary or desirable.
(3)  A vote of the shareholders of the subsidiary is not required with respect
to the merger. If the subsidiary will be the surviving corporation, the
approval of the shareholders of the parent shall be sought in the manner
provided in Subsections 16-10a-1103(1) through (6). If the parent will be the
surviving corporation, no vote of its shareholders is required if all of the
provisions of Subsection 16-10a-1103(7) are met with respect to the merger. If
all the provisions are not met, the approval of the shareholders of the parent
shall be sought in the manner provided in Subsections 16-10a-1103(1) through
(6).
(4)  The parent shall mail a copy or summary of the plan of merger to each
shareholder of the subsidiary (other than the parent) who does not waive this
mailing requirement in writing.
(5)  The effective date of the merger may not be earlier than the date on
which all shareholders of the subsidiary waived the mailing requirement of
Subsection (4) or 10 days after the date the parent mailed a copy or summary
of the plan of merger to each shareholder of the subsidiary who did not waive
the mailing requirement.
